Oklahoma, session 2026, SB431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified

in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 301 of Title 41, unless there is

created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

A. For the purposes of this section:

1. “Landlord” means the owner, lessor, or sublessor of a

residential or nonresidential property including, but not limited

to, the dwelling unit or the building of which it is a part,

manufactured or mobile home site, space, or lot; provided, it also

means a manager of the premises who fails to comply with the

disclosure provisions of Section 116 of Title 41 of the Oklahoma

Statutes;



Req. No. 1258 Page 1

2. “Tenant” means any person entitled under a rental agreement

to occupy a residential or nonresidential property; and

3. “Utility” means any corporation, association, company, or

individuals, or their trustees, lessees, or receivers, successors or

assigns, including cities, towns, or other bodies politic, that own,

operate, or manage any plant or equipment, or any part thereof,

directly or indirectly, for public use, or may supply or furnish gas

by pipeline, heat or light with gas, electric current for light,

heat, or power, or water for power or domestic purposes.

B. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no utility

operating in this state shall hold a landlord liable for bills,

fees, or charges for services accrued by a tenant occupying a

residential or nonresidential property otherwise owned or maintained

by the landlord.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-1258 RD 1/14/2025 3:51:21 PM















Req. No. 1258 Page 2